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PRE-CHECK

1.DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM

(@ Check the DLCS3.

HINT:

Thevehicle'sECMusesISO9  141-2forcommunication. The
terminal arrangement of the DLC3 complies with ISO 15031-3
andmatchesthelSO9 141-2format.

A04550

Terminal No. Connection/Voltage or Resistance Condition
7 Bus @ Line/Pulse generation During Transmission
4 Chassis Ground <> Body Ground/ 1 Q orless Always
16 Battery Positive <> BodyGround/ 9-14V Always
HINT:
If your display shows UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE
whenyou have connectedthe cable ofthe hand -heldtesterto

the DLCS, turned the ignition switch ON and operated the
hand-heldtester, thereis aproblem onthe vehicle side ortool
side.

. If communication is normalwhenthetoolis con-
nected to another vehicle, inspect the DLC3 on the
original vehicle.

. If communicationis still not possible when the tool
is connected to another vehicle, the problem is
probably in the tool itself, so consult the Service De-
partment listed in the tool’s instruction manual.

2. SRS WARNING LIGHT CHECK

(@ Turn the ignition switch to ON, and check that the SRS
warning light comes on.

(b) Check that the SRS warning light goes out after approx.
6 seconds.

e Whentheignition switchisat ON andthe SRS warning
light remains on or flashes, the airbag sensor assembly
H20916 has detected a malfunction code.
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. If, after approx. 6 seconds have elapsed, the SRS warn-
ing light sometimes comes on even when the ignition
switch is OFF. In this case, a short in the SRS warning light
circuit is possible. Proceed to "SRS warning light circuit
malfunction” on page DI- 768.
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3.
(@)

DTC CHECK (Using diagnosis check wire)

Present troubles codes:

Output the DTC.

(1) Turntheignition switchto ON, and waitfor approx.
10seconds.

(20 Using SST, connect terminal TC and CG of the
DLCS.

SST 09843 -18040

NOTICE:
Pay attention to the terminal connecting position to avoid
a malfunction.

(b)

Past troubles codes:

Output the DTC.

(1) Using SST, connectterminal TC and CG ofthe
DLCS.

SST 09843 -18040

(2)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait for approx.
10seconds.

NOTICE:
Pay attention to the terminal connecting position to avoid
a malfunction.
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() Readthe DTC.
Read the DTC by counting the blinking times. As an ex-
ample, the blinking patterns of normal, 11 and 31 are
shown in the illustration.
. Normal code indication (w/o past trouble
code)
The light blinks 2 times per seconds.
. Normal code indication (w/ past trouble code)
When the past troubles code is stored in the
airbag sensor assembly, the light blinks only
ones a second.
. Malfunction code indication
The first blinking indicates the first DTC. Se-
cond blinking occurs after 1.5-second of
pausing.
If there are 2 or more codes, there will be a 2.5-second pause
between each code. After all the codes are shown, there will be
a 4.0-second pausing, and they will all be repeated.
HINT:
. If 2 or more malfunctions are found, the indication starts
from the smaller numbered code.
. Ifthelightdoes notblink orcomes outatall, orif DTCs are
indicated without a connection of the terminals, proceed
to the TC terminal circuit inspection on page DI-773.

4.DTCCHECK (Usinghand -heldtester)

(@) Hookupthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Read the DTCs by following the prompts on the tester
screen.

HINT:

Pleaserefertothe hand

ther details.

5. DTC CLEARANCE (Not using service wire)

Whenthe ignition switchis turned OFF, the diagnostictrouble

code is cleared.

HINT:

Depending on the DTC, the code might not be cleared by turn-

ing the ignition switch OFF.

In this case, proceed to the next step.

6. DTC CLEARANCE (Using service wire)

(@ Using SST, connect terminal TC and CG.
SST 09843 -18040

(b) Disconnectterminal TC of DLC3 within 10seconds after
the DTCs appear, and check if the warning light come on
within 3.0 seconds.

() Within 2.0 seconds to 4.0 seconds after the SRS warning
lightcomeon,re -connecttheterminals TC and CG of
DLCs.

—heldtester operator’'s manual for fur-
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(d) SRS warning lightgoes off 3.0 seconds afterre —-connect-
ing the terminal TC and CG. Then disconnect the terminal
TC of DLC3within 2.0 to 4.0 seconds after the SRS warn-
ing light goes off.

(e) Warning light comes on within 3.0 seconds afterre —dis-
connecting the terminal TC and CG.

(f)  Within 2.0 seconds to 4.0 seconds after the SRS warning
lightcomeon,re -connecttheterminals TCand CG of
DLCs.

(9) SRS warning light goes off 3 seconds afterre —connecting
the terminal TC and CG.

(h) Normal code appears 1.0seconds afterthe SRS warning
light goes off.

If DTCs are not cleared, repeat the above procedure until the

codes are cleared.

SRS Warning
Light (*)
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OFF |
|
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T1: 0 - « second
T2: approx. 6 seconds
T3:3 - 5seconds
T4:3 - 10seconds
T5:2 - 4seconds
T6: 1 — 5seconds
T7:within 1 second
*: The pasttrouble code intheillustration shows DTC 2 1 asanexample.
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7. DTC CLEARANCE (Using hand-held tester)

(@) Hook up the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(b) Clear the DTCs by following the prompts on the tester
screen.

HINT:

Please refer to the hand-held tester operation’s manual for fur-

ther details.

8. RELEASE METHOD OF AIRBAG ACTIVATION PRE-
VENTION MECHANISM

An airbag activation prevention mechanism is built into the con-
nector for the squib circuit of the SRS.

As explained in the troubleshooting later, insert a paper with the
same thickness as the male terminal between the terminal and
the short spring to release it (Refer to illustrations on next 4
pages).

CAUTION:

Never release the airbag activation prevention mechanism

on the squib connector.

NOTICE:

S Do not release the airbag activation prevention mech-
anism unless specifically directed by the trouble-
shooting procedure.

S  To prevent the terminal and the short spring to be
damaged, always use a paper with the same thick-
ness as the male terminals.
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w/o Side Airbag:

(*1) ®

Seat Position Sensor (*4)

Front Seat Inner Belt RH (*4)

(*2)
@ Seat Belt

Pretensioner RH

0o e L9 Qe

Front Airbag Sensor RH
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@ Front Passenger Airbag
Assembly (Squib)

Airbag
Sensor @
Assembly (3 @ Shiral Cable
@ @ Steering Wheel
Pad (Squib)
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®

Front Airbag Sensor LH

@
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@ Seat Belt

Pretensioner LH
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Front Seat Inner Belt LH (*3)

() @ @

s, Seat Position Sensor (*3)
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®

*1: Separate Seat

*2: Bench Seat

*3: LHD, Dual Stage Airbag
*4: RHD, Dual Stage Airbag
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w/ Side Airbag:

Airbag
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Seat Position Sensor (*4)

Front Seat Inner Belt LH (*4)

Seat Belt
Pretensioner RH

Curtain Shield Airbag
Sensor Assembly RH

Side and Curtain Shield
Airbag Sensor Assembly RH

Curtain Shield Airbag
Assembly RH (Squib)

Side Airbag
Assembly RH (Squib)

Front Airbag Sensor RH

Front Passenger Airbag
Assembly (Squib)

Steering Wheel
Pad (Squib)

Front Airbag Sensor LH

Side Airbag
Assembly LH (Squib)

Curtain Shield Airbag
Assembly LH (Squib)

Side and Curtain Shield
Airbag Sensor Assembly LH

Curtain Shield Airbag
Sensor Assembly LH

Seat Belt
Pretensioner LH

Front Seat Inner Belt LH (*3)

Seat Position Sensor (*3)
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w/o Side Airbag:

Airbag Sensor Assembly Connector
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Before Release
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Connector @@@

Before Release

After Release

ASAN

SEERHIFFETTES

After Release

Paper

Paper

Short Spring (*1)
Short Spring (*2)

*1: Single Stage Airbag
*2: Dual Stage Airbag
H02297

H01233
H16883

H21585
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w/ Side Airbag:

Airbag Sensor Assembly Connector
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Short Spring

H16882 H01233
H16883
H09672 H09658

Short Spring

After Release
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After Release
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